Hawaii statutes.
[§447-1.5]
Community service license. (a)
The board of dental examiners may issue, without examination, a community
service license to practice dental hygiene in the employment of a federally
qualified health center, Native Hawaiian health care system, or post-secondary
dental auxiliary training program accredited by the American Dental Association
Commission on Dental Accreditation. Community service licensees under this
section shall abide by the requirements and conditions placed upon those fully
licensed under this chapter.

Eligible candidates shall:

(1) Provide copies of documentation and credentials
that include but are not limited to:

(A) A diploma or certificate of graduation
from a dental hygiene college accredited by the American Dental Association
Commission on Dental Accreditation, recognized and approved by the board; and

(B) Either of the following:

(i) A certificate or other evidence
satisfactory to the board of having passed the examination of the National
Board Dental Hygiene Examination, within five years of the date of request; or

(ii) Evidence of active clinical dental hygiene
practice of not less than one thousand hours per year for the three years
immediately prior to the date of request;

(2) Provide a copy of an active, unrestricted dental
hygiene practice license from another state;

(3) Disclose to the board of dental examiners all
previous and pending legal or regulatory action relating to claims of
malpractice, personal, or professional misconduct; and

(4) Pay applicable registration fees, which shall be
one half of the prevailing biennial registration fee for dental hygienists.

No person who after July 2, 2004, has failed to pass
the license examination administered under this chapter may be issued a
community service dental hygiene license.

(b) Community service licensees shall actively
participate in a formal and ongoing program of clinical quality assurance.

(c) A license may be renewed annually, pending
review and reauthorization of the board of dental examiners.

(d) A community service license authorizes the
licensee to practice dental hygiene only within the employment of an eligible
organization and shall be in force until the earliest of the following occurs:

(1) The date the person leaves the employment
authorized under the community service license;

(2) The date on which the results of the license
examination taken by the person under this chapter are posted by the board;

(3) The date the community service license expires;
or

(4) The date on which the board revokes the community
service license; provided that the board may revoke the community service
license at any time for cause.

(e) Commissioned officers of the United States
Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United States
Public Health Service, or the United States Veterans Administration practicing
in a federally qualified health center or Native Hawaiian health systems
center, shall qualify for a community service license to practice dental
hygiene, which may be issued for the term of the dental hygienists federal duty
assignment. Officers shall provide to the board of dental examiners:

(1) A copy of an active, unrestricted dental hygiene
license from another state; and

(2) A copy of documentation reflecting official duty
assignment to a qualifying community service dental hygiene license site. [L
2004, c 166, §2; am L 2006, c 31, §2]

Revision Note

"July 2, 2004," substituted for "the effective
date of this section".

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next